Massachusetts, session 194th, S944.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 15A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 39 the following section:-
Section 39A. (a) All public institutions of higher education, as set forth in section 5, shall
develop and adopt written policies and procedures to accept a score of three, four, and five on all
advanced placement examinations to satisfy degree requirements. The policies shall indicate
whether the credit shall be granted for general education, major, or elective requirements at the
institution, and shall include procedures related to the transferability of these credits to another
institution of higher education. An institution may not require an exam score of more than three
unless the chief academic officer provides evidence that the higher score is necessary for a
student to be successful in a related or more advanced course for which the lower-division course
of 3

is a prerequisite. The department of higher education shall provide guidance on what constitutes
as evidence for an institution to require an examination score of more than three.
(b) All policies and procedures governing the award of credit shall be posted on the
institution’s website under the category of admission, which the institution shall update as
necessary to reflect any changes in policies and procedures. In addition, each institution shall
submit its policies and procedures, or any changes thereto, to the department of higher education
who shall post each institution’s policies and procedures, or changes thereto, on the department’s
website.
(c) The board of higher education, and in the case of the University of Massachusetts, in
cooperation with the board of trustees of the University of Massachusetts, shall annually review
the advanced placement examination score course granting policies of each institution of higher
education and any evidence supporting policies requiring scores above 3 in accordance with the
requirements of this section, and report its findings, evidence supporting policies requiring scores
above 3, and any recommendations with the clerks of the senate and the house of representatives,
and the chairs of the joint committee on higher education not later than July 1. Each institution of
higher education shall provide the board of higher education, and in the case of the University of
Massachusetts, its board of trustees, with all necessary data, in accordance with the federal
Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, to conduct the analysis.
(d) All policies and procedures governing the award of credit shall be posted in an easily
accessible location on the institution’s website. The institution shall update the website as
necessary to reflect any changes in policies and procedures. Each institution shall submit its
of 3

policies and procedures, and any changes, to the department which shall post a summary of each
institution’s policies and procedures on the department’s website.
SECTION 2. The first annual report required by subsection (c) of section 39A of chapter
15A of the General Laws shall be published not later than July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. The department shall determine when section 1 shall take effect, but it shall
be no later than one year after enactment.
of 3